California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
  CHAPTER 2. Administrative Provisions [155. - 169.]

155.

The time fixed in this division for the performance of any act by the assessor or county board may be extended by the board or its executive director for not more than 30 days, or, in case of public calamity, 40 days. If an extension of time is granted, the executive director of the board shall give written notice thereof to the county auditor, county tax collector, and the officer or county board to whom the extension is granted. The executive director shall inform the board at its next regular meeting of any action with respect to extensions taken by him or her. There shall be the same extension of time for any act of the board dependent on the act for which time was extended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 471, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

155.3.

The time fixed for the performance of any act by the auditor or tax collector may be extended by the Controller for not more than 30 days, or, in the case of public calamity, 40 days. If an extension of time is granted, the Controller shall give written notice thereof to the county auditor, tax collector, assessor, and board of supervisors. There shall be the same extension of time for any act of the Controller dependent on the act for which time was extended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 411, Sec. 6.   Effective July 11, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 51 of Ch. 411.)
-------------------------------------------

155.20.

(a) Subject to the limitations listed in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e), a county board of supervisors may exempt from property tax all real property with a base year value (as determined pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 50) of Part 0.5) as adjusted by an annual inflation factor pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 110.1, and personal property with a full value so low that, if not exempt, the total taxes, special assessments, and applicable subventions on the property would amount to less than the cost of assessing and collecting them.

(b) (1) (A) The board of supervisors shall have no authority to exempt property with a total base
 year value, as adjusted by an annual inflation factor pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 110.1, or full value of more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B).

(B) The limitation specified in subparagraph (A) on the amount of the exemption authorized by this section shall be increased as follows:

(i) For lien dates occurring on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2030, the limitation is increased to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the case of a possessory interest.

(ii) For lien dates occurring on or after January 1, 2030, the limitation is increased to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the case of a possessory interest, for a temporary and transitory use,
 in a publicly owned fairground, fairground facility, convention facility, or cultural facility. For purposes of this paragraph, “publicly owned convention or cultural facility” means a publicly owned convention center, civic auditorium, theater, assembly hall, museum, or other civic building that is used primarily for staging any of the following:

(I) Conventions, trade and consumer shows, or civic and community events.

(II) Live theater, dance, or musical productions.

(III) Artistic, historic, technological, or educational exhibits.

(2) In determining the level of the exemption, the board of supervisors shall determine at what level of exemption
 the costs of assessing the property and collecting taxes, assessments, and subventions on the property exceeds the proceeds to be collected. The board of supervisors shall establish the exemption level uniformly for different classes of property. In making this determination, the board of supervisors may consider the total taxes, special assessments, and applicable subventions for the year of assessment only or for the year of assessment and succeeding years where cumulative revenues will not exceed the cost of assessments and collections.

(3) In administering the exemption authorized by this section, the assessor may opt either to not enroll the property on the assessment roll or to enroll the property and apply the exemption.

(c) This section does not apply to those real or
 personal properties enumerated in Section 52.

(d) The exemption authorized by this section shall be adopted by the board of supervisors on or before the lien date for the fiscal year to which the exemption is to apply and may, at the option of the board of supervisors, continue in effect for succeeding fiscal years. Any revision or rescission of the exemption shall be adopted by the board of supervisors on or before the lien date for the fiscal year to which that revision or rescission is to apply.

(e) Nothing in this section shall authorize a county board of supervisors to exempt new construction, unless the new total base year value, as adjusted by an annual inflation factor pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 110.1, of the property, including this new construction, is ten
 thousand dollars ($10,000) or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 498, Sec. 1.   (SB 1527)   Effective September 22, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

156.

In the assessment, advertisement, and sale of real property for taxes, initial letters, abbreviations, and figures may be used to designate the township, range, section, or part of a section. Any other abbreviations approved by the board may be used if an explanation of them appears on each page of the roll or a reference appears on each page to a list of abbreviations within each volume of the roll, or if the procedure in Section 109.6 is adopted the list of abbreviations used shall be available to the public in the office of the tax collector. Such list of abbreviations shall be furnished to the tax collector by the assessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

158.

The Controller has general supervision over the general procedure for tax sales, tax deeds, and redemptions and, to this end, may make any rules and regulations he deems advisable. All county officials are bound by these rules and regulations of the Controller.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

160.

In any action against the county to quiet title allowed under this division, service of process shall be made on the tax collector of the county where the real property is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

162.

The assessor, tax collector, and auditor shall, except where specifically prohibited by law, charge and collect a fee of one dollar ($1) for preparing each of the following documents:

(a) A certified copy of a redemption certificate.

(b) A certified copy of an installment redemption receipt.

(c) A certified copy of an assessment as entered on the assessment roll.

The fee for providing a copy of a record or document by photographic process shall be the actual cost thereof plus the sum of one dollar ($1). The fee shall be placed in the
 county general fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 207, Sec. 1.   (AB 820)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

162.1.

(a) The assessor, tax collector, or auditor shall charge and collect a fee to cover the actual and reasonable costs incurred by the assessor, tax collector, or auditor to prepare a certificate of payment showing taxes paid.

(b) The amount of the fee shall be established by the board of supervisors of the county and shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 207, Sec. 2.   (AB 820)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

162.5.

Any taxing agency, including a taxing agency having its own system for the levying and collection of taxes or assessments, but excluding a county, may by ordinance or resolution of its governing body provide that the county recorder shall file, record, index, and make notations upon, written instruments pertaining to the assessment, sale, and deeding (whether to such agency or a purchaser therefrom) of property taxed or assessed by such agency in the same manner and with the same effect as provided in this division with respect to comparable instruments pertaining to property subject to county taxes, and the county recorder shall comply with such ordinance or resolution upon payment of the same fees as if the taxing agency were the county. The recorded duplicate of any deed to a taxing agency other than the State or county shall be forwarded by the county recorder to the officer designated in the ordinance or resolution.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 162 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

163.

Any entity that receives revenue that is derived from payments with respect to an assessment lien created pursuant to the Improvement Bond Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code) shall annually notify the assessor of all of the following:

(a) The lien amount on each subject parcel at the time the lien was created.

(b) In the case in which a lien has been completely satisfied, the date and amount of the payment in satisfaction of the lien, and the identity of the party that made that payment.

(c) The amount of the principal balance of the lien on each subject parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 527, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

163.5.

The provisions of this division relating to actions and proceedings for quieting title to property, and holding any tax deed to be void, shall apply to property assessed, sold, or deeded for the taxes or assessments of any taxing agency, including a taxing agency having its own system for the levying and collection of taxes or assessments, but excluding a county, the same, or as nearly the same as possible, as such provisions apply to property assessed, sold, or deeded for county taxes. For this purpose when used in such provisions:

(a) “State” or “county” means the taxing agency.

(b) “Controller” means the governing body of the taxing agency.

(c) “District attorney” means the attorney or legal counsel of the taxing agency.

Any reference in such provisions to all or any portion of this division shall be deemed for the purposes of this section to refer to comparable provisions of the law, charter, or ordinance pursuant to which the taxing agency involved levies and collects taxes or assessments on property.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 163 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

164.

The chief accounting officer of each taxing agency other than the State, may examine and audit the accounts of any other taxing agency, other than the State, charged under any provision of this code with the apportionment of the proceeds of collections made on behalf of both agencies. In the event more than one taxing agency has an interest in such collections the governing bodies of the interested taxing agencies may enter into an agreement to accept the report on the audit of the chief accounting officer of one of such interested taxing agencies.

As used in this section, “chief accounting officer” means as to a county the auditor thereof, as to a city the auditor thereof, as to an irrigation district the secretary of the board of directors thereof, and as to any other taxing agency the officer designated as its chief accounting officer by the governing body thereof.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 163 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1565.)
-------------------------------------------

166.

(a) Whenever a taxpayer is required to file any statement, affidavit, application, or any other paper or document with a taxing agency by a specified time on a specified date, such filing shall be deemed to be within the specified period if it is sent by United States mail, properly addressed with postage prepaid, and bears a post office cancellation mark of the specified date, or earlier within the specified period, stamped on the envelope, or on itself, or if proof satisfactory to the agency establishes that the mailing occurred on the specified date, or earlier within the specified period.

(b) The provisions of this section shall supersede any contrary special provision of this division unless such special provision specifically provides that this section shall not be applicable.

(c) The provisions of this section are applicable to any filing required to be made by ordinance, rule, or regulation of a taxing agency.

(d) Any statement or affidavit made by a taxpayer asserting such a timely filing must be made within one year of the deadline applicable to the original filing; provided, however, that this subsection shall not apply to any statement or affidavit asserting the timely filing of a property statement or to any statement made by the taxpayer in connection with an escape assessment imposed pursuant to Section 531.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section be liberally construed in favor of the taxpayer and be applicable to all filings relating to property taxation which are required to be made by a taxpayer by a specified time on a specified date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 748.)
-------------------------------------------

167.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and except as provided in subdivision (b), there shall be a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof in favor of the taxpayer or assessee who has supplied all information as required by law to the assessor in any administrative hearing involving the imposition of a tax on an owner-occupied single-family dwelling, the assessment of an owner-occupied single-family dwelling pursuant to this division, or the appeal of an escape assessment.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the rebuttable presumption described in that subdivision shall not apply in the case of an administrative hearing with respect to the appeal
 of an escape assessment resulting from a taxpayer’s failure either to file with the assessor a change in ownership statement or a business property statement, or to obtain a permit for new construction.

(c) For the purposes of this section, an owner-occupied single-family dwelling means a single-family dwelling that satisfies both of the following:

(1) The dwelling is the owner’s principal place of residence.

(2) The dwelling qualifies for a homeowners’ property tax exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   (AB 711)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

168.

Any document required in this division to be executed by the tax collector may be executed with a facsimile signature in lieu of a manual signature if the manual signature is filed with the Secretary of State and is certified under oath by the tax collector.

Upon compliance with this section, the facsimile signature shall have the same legal effect as the manual signature of the tax collector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 431, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

168.1.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 16.5 of the Government Code, if a county assessor authorizes the submission of a State Board of Equalization form by the use of electronic media pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 441, a taxpayer may execute that form by electronic signature in lieu of a manual, facsimile, or other signature if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The electronic signature is accompanied by a form in the signature block that states that the taxpayer certifies or declares under penalty of perjury that all the information, including accompanying statements or materials, in the document is true, correct, and
 complete to the best of the taxpayer’s knowledge.

(2) The electronic signature is authenticated in a manner that is approved by the State Board of Equalization.

(b) If a county assessor authorizes the submission of a
 State Board of Equalization form by the use of electronic media and a taxpayer chooses to execute that form by the use of electronic signature pursuant to subdivision (a), a county assessor shall accept the electronic signature pursuant to this section. The county assessor may require payment of a fee in an amount equal to the reasonable costs associated with accepting an electronic signature.

(c) Every county shall adopt any necessary ordinances, resolutions, or other procedures to give effect to this section.

(d) Upon compliance with this section, the electronic signature shall have the same legal effect as the manual, facsimile, or other signature of the taxpayer.

(e) For purposes of this section, “electronic signature” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (h) of Section 1633.2 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 217, Sec. 1.   (AB 1879)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

168.5.

Any document required in this division to be acknowledged by the county clerk at no charge may be acknowledged by a notary public or other county official pursuant to Section 1181 of the Civil Code, at no charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 941, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

169.

The board shall encourage uniform statewide appraisal and assessment practices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Disaster Relief [170. - 171.5.]

170.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board of supervisors, by ordinance, may provide that every assessee of any taxable property, or any person liable for the taxes thereon, whose property was damaged or destroyed without the assessee’s or liable person’s fault, may apply for reassessment of that property as provided in this section. The ordinance may also specify that the assessor shall have the discretion to determine the appropriate date of damage and may initiate the reassessment where the assessor determines that within the preceding 12 months taxable property located in the county was damaged or destroyed.

To be eligible for reassessment the damage or destruction to the property shall have been
 caused by any of the following:

(1) A major misfortune or calamity, in an area or region subsequently proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster, if that property was damaged or destroyed by the major misfortune or calamity that caused the Governor to proclaim the area or region to be in a state of emergency, pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code, or a state of disaster. As used in this paragraph, “damage” includes a diminution in the value of property as a result of restricted access to the property where that restricted access was caused by the major misfortune or calamity.

(2) A misfortune or calamity.

(3) A misfortune or calamity that, with respect to a possessory interest in land owned by the
 state or federal government, has caused the permit or other right to enter upon the land to be suspended or restricted. As used in this paragraph, “misfortune or calamity” includes a drought condition such as existed in this state in 1976 and 1977.

The application for reassessment may be filed within the time specified in the ordinance or within 12 months of the misfortune or calamity, whichever is later, by delivering to the assessor a written application requesting reassessment showing the condition and value, if any, of the property immediately after the damage or destruction, and the dollar amount of the damage. The application shall be executed under penalty of perjury, or if executed outside the State of California, verified by affidavit.

An ordinance may be made applicable to a major misfortune or calamity
 specified in paragraph (1) or to any misfortune or calamity specified in paragraph (2), or to both, as the board of supervisors determines. An ordinance shall not be made applicable to a misfortune or calamity specified in paragraph (3), unless an ordinance making paragraph (2) applicable is operative in the county. The ordinance may specify a period of time within which the ordinance shall be effective, and, if no period of time is specified, it shall remain in effect until repealed.

(b) Upon receiving a proper application, the assessor shall appraise the property and determine separately the full cash value of land, improvements and personalty immediately before and after the damage or destruction. If the sum of the full cash values of the land, improvements and personalty before the damage or destruction exceeds the sum of the values after
 the damage by ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, the assessor shall also separately determine the percentage reductions in value of land, improvements and personalty due to the damage or destruction. The assessor shall reduce the values appearing on the assessment roll by the percentages of damage or destruction computed pursuant to this subdivision, and the taxes due on the property shall be adjusted as provided in subdivision (e). However, the amount of the reduction shall not exceed the actual loss.

(c) (1) As used in this subdivision, “board” means either the county board of supervisors acting as the county board of equalization, or an assessment appeals board established by the county board of supervisors in accordance with Section 1620, as applicable.

(2) The assessor shall notify the applicant in writing of the amount of the proposed reassessment. The notice shall state that the applicant may appeal the proposed reassessment to the board within six months of the date of mailing the notice. If an appeal is requested within the six-month period, the board shall hear and decide the matter as if the proposed reassessment had been entered on the roll as an assessment made outside the regular assessment period. The decision of the board regarding the damaged value of the property shall be final, provided that a decision of the board regarding any reassessment made pursuant to this section shall create no presumption as regards the value of the affected property subsequent to the date of the damage.

(3) Those reassessed values resulting from reductions in full cash value of amounts,
 as determined above, shall be forwarded to the auditor by the assessor or the clerk of the board, as the case may be. The auditor shall enter the reassessed values on the roll. After being entered on the roll, those reassessed values shall not be subject to review, except by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(d) (1) If no application is made and the assessor determines that within the preceding 12 months a property has suffered damage caused by misfortune or calamity that may qualify the property owner for relief under an ordinance adopted under this section, the assessor shall provide the last known owner of the property with an application for reassessment. The property owner shall file the completed application within 12 months after the occurrence of that damage. Upon receipt of a properly completed, timely filed
 application, the property shall be reassessed in the same manner as required in subdivision (b).

(2) This subdivision does not apply where the assessor initiated reassessment as provided in subdivision (a) or (l).

(e) The tax rate fixed for property on the roll on which the property so reassessed appeared at the time of the misfortune or calamity, shall be applied to the amount of the reassessment as determined in accordance with this section and the assessee shall be liable for: (1) a prorated portion of the taxes that would have been due on the property for the current fiscal year had the misfortune or calamity not occurred, to be determined on the basis of the number of months in the current fiscal year prior to the misfortune or calamity; plus, (2) a proration of the tax
 due on the property as reassessed in its damaged or destroyed condition, to be determined on the basis of the number of months in the fiscal year after the damage or destruction, including the month in which the damage was incurred. For purposes of applying the preceding calculation in prorating supplemental taxes, the term “fiscal year” means that portion of the tax year used to determine the adjusted amount of taxes due pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 75.41. If the damage or destruction occurred after January 1 and before the beginning of the next fiscal year, the reassessment shall be utilized to determine the tax liability for the next fiscal year. However, if the property is fully restored during the next fiscal year, taxes due for that year shall be prorated based on the number of months in the year before and after the completion of restoration.

(f) Any tax paid in excess of the total tax due shall be refunded to the taxpayer pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 5096) of Part 9, as an erroneously collected tax or by order of the board of supervisors without the necessity of a claim being filed pursuant to Chapter 5.

(g) The assessed value of the property in its damaged condition, as determined pursuant to subdivision (b) compounded annually by the inflation factor specified in subdivision (a) of Section 51, shall be the taxable value of the property until it is restored, repaired, reconstructed or other provisions of the law require the establishment of a new base year value.

If partial reconstruction, restoration, or repair has occurred on any subsequent lien date, the taxable value shall be increased by an amount
 determined by multiplying the difference between its factored base year value immediately before the calamity and its assessed value in its damaged condition by the percentage of the repair, reconstruction, or restoration completed on that lien date.

(h) (1) When the property is fully repaired, restored, or reconstructed, the assessor shall make an additional assessment or assessments in accordance with subparagraph (A) or (B) upon completion of the repair, restoration, or reconstruction:

(A) If the completion of the repair, restoration, or reconstruction occurs on or after January 1, but on or before May 31, then there shall be two additional assessments. The first additional assessment shall be the difference between the new taxable value as of the date of
 completion and the taxable value on the current roll. The second additional assessment shall be the difference between the new taxable value as of the date of completion and the taxable value to be enrolled on the roll being prepared.

(B) If the completion of the repair, restoration, or reconstruction occurs on or after June 1, but before the succeeding January 1, then the additional assessment shall be the difference between the new taxable value as of the date of completion and the taxable value on the current roll.

(2) On the lien date following completion of the repair, restoration, or reconstruction, the assessor shall enroll the new taxable value of the property as of that lien date.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision,
 “new taxable value” shall mean the lesser of the property’s (A) full cash value, or (B) factored base year value or its factored base year value as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 70.

(i) The assessor may apply Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) of Part 0.5 in implementing this section, to the extent that chapter is consistent with this section.

(j) This section applies to all counties, whether operating under a charter or under the general laws of this state.

(k) Any ordinance in effect pursuant to former Section 155.1, 155.13, or 155.14 shall remain in effect according to its terms as if that ordinance was adopted pursuant to this section, subject to the limitations of subdivision (b).

(l) When the assessor does not have the general authority pursuant to subdivision (a) to initiate reassessments, if no application is made and the assessor determines that within the preceding 12 months a property has suffered damage caused by misfortune or calamity, that may qualify the property owner for relief under an ordinance adopted under this section, the assessor, with the approval of the board of supervisors, may reassess the particular property for which approval was granted as provided in subdivision (b) and notify the last known owner of the property of the reassessment.

(m) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in the case of property damaged or destroyed by the
 2025 Palisades Fire, Eaton Fire, Hurst Fire, Lidia Fire, Sunset Fire, or Woodley Fire, or the 2024 Mountain Fire or Franklin Fire, for which the Governor proclaimed a state of emergency, the application for reassessment may be filed within the time specified in the ordinance or within 24 months of the misfortune or calamity, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 549, Sec. 2.   (SB 663)   Effective October 10, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

170.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any law, as authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 51, each property located within a five-mile radius of the center of the Chiquita Canyon Landfill in the County of Los Angeles shall be reassessed so that the full cash value base of the property reflects any decline in value of the property arising from the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event.

(b) Reassessments pursuant to this section shall be retroactive to the January 1, 2022, lien date. Following reassessment, the assessor shall send notice of the assessment value change to the taxpayer. The notice shall state both the amount of the assessment value change and, if property taxes were paid at the higher assessment value,
 that a refund claim may be filed with the auditor-controller pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 5096) of Part 9.

(c) For purposes of this subdivision, “Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event” means the elevated temperature landfill event that occurred beneath the Chiquita Canyon Landfill in the County of Los Angeles.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 174, Sec. 1.   (AB 985)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

171.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no interest or penalties shall be imposed or collected with respect to any delinquent installments of property taxes levied for the 1992–93 fiscal year on qualified residential real property.

(b) The county treasurer or tax collector shall not take any collection action, and shall cease any collection action that has commenced, with respect to any delinquent property taxes for the 1992–93 fiscal year that were levied on qualified real property, until on or after January 1, 1994. The treasurer or tax collector may impose any applicable interest and penalties on any delinquent property taxes levied on qualified real property for the 1992–93 fiscal year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, if those taxes or any portion thereof remain delinquent on or after that date.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified residential real property” means any residential real property that meets all of the following conditions:

(A) No amount of property taxes levied on that property was delinquent at the close of the 1991–92 fiscal year.

(B) The owner of the property suffered economic hardship as a result of the civil unrest that occurred in Los Angeles in April and May 1992.

(C) The property is eligible for a homeowner’s exemption.

(2) An owner shall be deemed to have suffered “economic hardship” if both of the following occur:

(A) The owner signs a declaration under penalty of perjury under the laws of this state that he or she suffered economic hardship as a result of the civil unrest that occurred in Los Angeles in April and May 1992.

(B) A business owned by the taxpayer, the taxpayer’s primary place of work, or the taxpayer’s residence that qualifies for the homeowner’s exemption is located in the area designated as the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone pursuant to Government Code Section 7102.

(d) A claim for relief under this section shall be filed by an owner on a form and in the manner as the treasurer or tax collector shall prescribe.

(e) The treasurer or tax collector shall permit any individual entitled to relief under this section who has paid any interest or penalties in connection with delinquent taxes levied for the 1992–93 fiscal year on qualified residential real property prior to filing a claim for relief to also file a claim for refund of the interest and penalties paid on a form and in the manner as the treasurer or tax collector shall prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 153.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

171.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 51, for purposes of determining the full cash value of qualified real property, the fair market value of that qualified real property on January 1, 2025, shall be its full cash value as of the date the property was damaged or destroyed, taking into account reductions in value due to damage, destruction, depreciation, obsolescence, removal of property, or other factors causing a decline in value.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified real property” shall mean real property impacted by the 2025 Palisades Fire, Eaton Fire, Hurst Fire, Lidia Fire, Sunset Fire, or Woodley Fire, for which the Governor proclaimed a state of emergency, if the sum of the full cash values of the land, improvements, and personality before
 the damage or destruction exceeds the sum of the values after the damage by ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, and if the property is not eligible for relief under Section 170.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 530, Sec. 2.   (AB 245)   Effective October 10, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.6. Disaster Relief for Manufactured Homes [172. - 172.1.]

172.

Whenever a manufactured home is destroyed on or after January 1, 1982, as the result of a disaster declared by the Governor, the owner shall be entitled to relief from local property taxation or vehicle license fees in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

172.1.

(a) To claim tax relief in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the owner shall execute a declaration under penalty of perjury that the replaced manufactured home was destroyed by a disaster declared by the Governor and shall furnish with that declaration any other information, prescribed by the Department of Housing and Community Development after consultation with the California Assessors’ Association, as is necessary to establish eligibility for relief under this chapter.

To be eligible for relief under this chapter, the replacement manufactured home must be comparable in size, utility, and location, as determined by the county assessor, with the destroyed manufactured home.

For purpose of this section, “destroyed” means damaged to such an extent that the cost of repair to the manufactured home would exceed its value at that time immediately preceding its destruction, or the manufactured home is declared a total loss for insurance purposes.

(b) If the replacement manufactured home is subject to local property taxation, the affidavit and documentation required by subdivision (a) shall be forwarded to the assessor of the county of situs. If the assessor determines that the owner of the replacement manufactured home is eligible for tax relief in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the assessor shall, notwithstanding any other provision of law, do either of the following:

(1) If the destroyed manufactured home was subject to the vehicle license fee, enroll the replacement manufactured home with an assessed valuation so that the local property taxes paid shall be the same amount as the vehicle license fee and registration fee due on the destroyed manufactured home for the year prior to its destruction.

(2) If the destroyed manufactured home was subject to local property taxation, enroll the replacement manufactured home at a taxable value equal to the taxable value of the destroyed manufactured home at the time of its destruction.

(c) If the assessor determines that the owner of the replacement manufactured home is not eligible for tax relief in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the replacement manufactured home shall be assessed in accordance with Part 13 (commencing with Section 5800).

(d) If the replacement manufactured home is subject to the vehicle license fee, the affidavit and documentation required by subdivision (a) shall be forwarded to the Department of Housing and Community Development. If the department determines that the owner is eligible for tax relief in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the department shall do either of the following:

(1) If the destroyed manufactured home was subject to the vehicle license fee, assign an in-lieu taxation classification and rating year for determination of depreciation such that the owner of the replacement manufactured home will be charged registration and license fees no greater than those he or she would have been charged for the destroyed manufactured home.

(2) If the destroyed manufactured home was subject to local property taxation, assign an in-lieu taxation classification and rating year for determination of depreciation such that the owner of the replacement manufactured home will be charged registration and license fees equal to local property taxes paid on the destroyed manufactured home for the year prior to its destruction.

(e) If the department determines that a replacement manufactured home subject to the vehicle license fee is not eligible for tax relief in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the vehicle license fee for the replacement manufactured home shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of Sections 18115 and 18115.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) If the tax on a replacement manufactured home determined in accordance with subdivision (b) or (d) is greater than the tax would be if determined without reference to this chapter, the lesser amount shall be levied.

(g) If a manufactured home subject to tax relief in accordance with the provisions of this chapter is subsequently sold or transferred to another party, the subsequent owner shall not receive this tax relief unless he or she is eligible in his or her own right for that relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Limitation of Actions [175. - 177.]

175.
